Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Chapter 9. Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry Act.
§ 9.1-914.
Automatic notification of registration to certain entities; electronic notification to requesting persons.

Any school or day-care service and child-minding service; state-regulated or state-licensed child day center, child day program, or family day home as those terms are defined in § 22.1-289.02; assisted living facility, children’s residential facility, or foster home as those terms are defined in §

63.2-100

; nursing home or certified nursing facility as those terms are defined in §

32.1-123

; association of a common interest community as defined in §

54.1-2345

; and institution of higher education may request from the State Police and, upon compliance with the requirements therefor established by the State Police, shall be eligible to receive from the State Police electronic notice of the registration, reregistration, or verification of registration information of any offender and if such entities do not have the capability of receiving such electronic notice, the entity may register with the State Police to receive written notification of offender registration, reregistration, or verification of registration information. Within three business days of receipt by the State Police of registration, reregistration, or verification of registration information, the State Police shall electronically or in writing notify an entity listed above that has requested such notification, has complied with the requirements established by the State Police and is located in the same or a contiguous zip code area as the address of the offender as shown on the registration.

The Virginia Council for Private Education shall annually provide the State Police, in an electronic format approved by the State Police, with the location of every private school in the Commonwealth that is accredited through one of the approved accrediting agencies of the Council, and an electronic mail address for each school if available, for purposes of receiving notice under this section.

Any person may request from the State Police and, upon compliance with the requirements therefor established by the State Police, shall be eligible to receive from the State Police electronic notice of the registration, reregistration, or verification of registration information of any offender. Within three business days of receipt by the State Police of registration, reregistration, or verification of registration information, the State Police shall electronically notify a person who has requested such notification, has complied with the requirements established by the State Police and is located in the same or a contiguous zip code area as the address of the offender as shown on the registration.

The State Police shall establish reasonable guidelines governing the automatic dissemination of Registry information, which may include the payment of a fee, whether a one-time fee or a regular assessment, to maintain the electronic access. The fee, if any, shall defray the costs of establishing and maintaining the electronic notification system and notice by mail.

For the purposes of this section:

“Child-minding service”
means provision of temporary custodial care or supervisory services for the minor child of another;

“Day-care service”
means provision of supplementary care and protection during a part of the day for the minor child of another; and

“School”
means any public, religious or private educational institution, including any preschool, elementary school, secondary school, post-secondary school, trade or professional institution, or institution of higher education.

History.

2003, c. 584; 2005, c. 928; 2006, cc. 857, 914; 2007, cc. 119, 164; 2016, c. 424; 2020, cc. 829, 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “54.1-2345” for “55-528.”

Acts 2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 928 substituted “religious” for “parochial, denominational” in the last paragraph.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 857 and 914 are identical, and in the first paragraph, inserted “nursing home or certified nursing facility as defined in §

32.1-123

, and any institution of higher education” and substituted “and if such entities” for “Entities that request and are entitled to this notification, and that” in the first sentence, and inserted “listed above” in the last sentence; added the second and third paragraphs; and made stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 119 and 164 are identical, and inserted “assisted living facility” near the beginning of the first sentence in the first paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 deleted “or” preceding “reregistration,” inserted “or verification of registration information” following “reregistration,” and deleted “sex” preceding “offender” throughout the first paragraph; deleted “or” preceding “reregistration,” inserted “or verification of registration information” following “reregistration,” and deleted “sex” preceding “offender” in third paragraph.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in the first paragraph, first sentence, substituted “Any school or day-care service and child-minding service; state-regulated or state-licensed child day center, child day program, or family day home, as those terms are defined in § 22.1-289.02; assisted living facility, children’s residential facility, or foster home as those terms are defined in §

63.2-100

; nursing home or certified nursing facility as those terms are” for “Any school, day-care service and child-minding service, state-regulated or state-licensed child day center, child day program, children’s residential facility, family day home, assisted living facility or foster home as defined in §

63.2-100

, nursing home or certified nursing facility as” and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 311 (2007).

§ 9.1-915.
Regulations.

The Superintendent of State Police shall promulgate regulations and develop forms to implement and enforce this chapter; including the operation and maintenance of the Registry and the removal of records on persons who are deceased, whose convictions have been reversed or who have been pardoned, and those for whom an order of removal or relief from frequent registration has been entered. Such regulations and forms shall not be subject to the provisions of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act.

History.

2003, c. 584.

§ 9.1-916.
Requests for Registry data by Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission; confidentiality.

Upon request of the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission, the Department of State Police shall provide the Commission with Registry data in an electronic format. The Commission may use the data for research, evaluative or statistical purposes only and shall ensure the confidentiality and security of the data.

History.

2003, c. 391.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the section having been added as subsection E of §

19.2-390.1

, by Acts 2003, c. 391.

§ 9.1-917.
Limitation on liability.

No liability shall be imposed upon any law-enforcement official who disseminates information or fails to disseminate information in good faith compliance with the requirements of this chapter, but this provision shall not be construed to grant immunity for gross negligence or willful misconduct.

History.

2003, c. 584.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2003 act having been

9.1-916

.

§ 9.1-918.
Misuse of registry or supplement information; penalty.

Use of registry information or information from the Supplement to the Registry established pursuant to §

9.1-923

for purposes not authorized by this chapter is prohibited, the unlawful use of the information contained in or derived from the Registry or Supplement for purposes of intimidating or harassing another is prohibited, and a willful violation of this chapter is a Class 1 misdemeanor. For purposes of this section, absent other aggravating circumstances, the mere republication or reasonable distribution of material contained on or derived from the publicly available Internet offender database shall not be deemed intimidation or harassment.

History.

2003, c. 584; 2006, cc. 857, 914; 2015, cc. 594, 603; 2020, c. 829.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2003 act having been

9.1-917

.

Cross references.

As to penalty for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 857 and 914 are identical, and added the last sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 594 and 603 are identical, and inserted “or information from the Supplement to the Registry established pursuant to §

9.1-923

” following “information” and added “or Supplement” following “Registry” in the first sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 deleted “sex” preceding “offender.”

§ 9.1-919.
Notice of penalty on forms and documents.

The Virginia Criminal Information Network and any form or document used by the Department of State Police to disseminate information from the Registry shall provide notice that any unauthorized use of the information with the intent to harass or intimidate another is a crime punishable as a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

2003, c. 391.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the section having been added as subsection H of §

19.2-390.1

, by Acts 2003, c. 391.

Cross references.

As to penalty for Class 1 misdemeanor, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 9.1-920.
Liberal construction.

This chapter, being necessary for the welfare of the Commonwealth and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof.

History.

2003, c. 584; 2015, c. 709.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2003 act having been

9.1-918

.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 709 deleted the first sentence pertaining to severability.

§ 9.1-921.
Exemption of information systems from provisions related to the Virginia Information Technologies Agency.

The provisions of Chapter 20.1 (§

2.2-2005

et seq.) of Title 2.2 shall not apply to the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1, operated by the Department of State Police or to information technology as defined in §

2.2-2006

operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice, Department of Corrections or the Virginia Compensation Board that interact, furnish, update, contain or exchange information with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry.

History.

2006, cc. 857, 914.

§ 9.1-922.
Use of Registry data by Statewide Automated Victim Notification (SAVIN) system; confidentiality.

Upon request of the Compensation Board, the Department of State Police shall provide the Statewide Automated Victim Notification (SAVIN) system with Registry data in an electronic format. The Board or its contractor may use the data for verification of registrant status and notification of victims and law enforcement regarding changes in status of persons on the Registry and shall ensure the confidentiality and security of the data.

History.

2008, cc. 76, 338.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 76, cl. 2, provides:
“That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [March 2, 2008].”

Acts 2008, c. 338, cl. 2, provides:
“That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [March 4, 2008].”

§ 9.1-923.
Supplement to the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry established.

The Superintendent of State Police shall establish a Supplement to the Registry of information composed of persons who were convicted of an offense listed in subsection B on or after July 1, 1980, and before July 1, 1994, but whose names are not on the Registry. Access to the Supplement to the Registry shall be made available to the public on the website of the Department of State Police and shall contain the following information for each person: name, year of birth, the date of the conviction, the jurisdiction in which the conviction occurred, the person’s age on the date of the conviction, the offense of which he was convicted, and the Code of Virginia section of the conviction.

Information on the following offenses where the conviction occurred on or after July 1, 1980, and before July 1, 1994, shall be listed in the Supplement: clause (i) of §

18.2-48

if the victim was a minor; clauses (ii) and (iii) of §

18.2-48

; §

18.2-61

; §

18.2-63

if the victim was under 13 years of age; subsection A of §

18.2-63

if the offender was more than five years older than the victim; §§

18.2-67.1

,

18.2-67.2

, and

18.2-67.3

; §

18.2-67.4

if the victim was a minor; subsections A and B of §

18.2-67.5

; subsection C of §

18.2-67.5

if the victim was a minor; §

18.2-361

if the victim was a minor; and §§

18.2-370

,

18.2-370

.1, and

18.2-374.1

.

Persons whose names and conviction information appear on the Supplement are not subject to the registration requirements of this chapter and are not considered persons for whom registration is required unless they are required to register pursuant to other provisions of this chapter.

A person whose name and conviction information appear on the Supplement may, regardless of the date of conviction, petition the circuit court in which he was convicted or the circuit court where he then resides for removal of his name and conviction information from the Supplement if the offense he was convicted of would qualify for removal from the Registry under §

9.1-910

. A petition may not be filed until all court ordered treatment, counseling, and restitution has been completed. The court shall obtain a copy of the petitioner’s complete criminal history and then hold a hearing on the petition at which the applicant and any interested persons may present witnesses and other evidence. The Commonwealth shall be made a party to any action under this subsection. If after such a hearing, the court is satisfied that such person does not pose a risk to public safety, the court shall grant the petition. In the event the petition is not granted, the person shall wait at least 24 months from the date of denial to file a new petition for removal from the Supplement. The State Police shall remove from the Supplement the name and conviction information upon receipt of an order granting a petition pursuant to this subsection.

The Superintendent of State Police shall complete the Supplement to the Registry prior to January 1, 2016.

History.

2015, cc. 594, 603.